exercise3/finnish_vowel_harmony.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
        +Nom +Gen +Ade +Abl +All +Ine +Ela +Tra +Ess
        +kin +kAAn +kO +hAn
        ! TO DO: Add more multicharacter symbols as needed

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;
! TO DO: Add your compound-words lexicons here

LEXICON Nouns
kissa   Next ;
koira   Next ;
melu    Next ;
metsä   Next ;
peli    Next ;
päivä   Next ;
pää     Next ;
sähkö   Next ;
talo    Next ;
tie     Next ;
tuoli   Next ;
työ     Next ;
väri    Next ;
yö      Next ;

LEXICON Next
0:%^    Nouns ;     
        Case ; 

LEXICON Case
+Nom:0          kinkAAn ;
+Gen:n          kinkAAn ;
+Ade:llA        kinkAAn ;
+Abl:ltA        kinkAAn ;
+All:lle        kinkAAn ;
+Ine:ssA        kinkAAn ;
+Ela:stA        kinkAAn ;
+Tra:ksi        kinkAAn ;
+Ess:nA         kinkAAn ;

LEXICON kinkAAn
+kin:kin        kO ;
+kAAn:kAAn      kO ;
                kO ; ! continue without any suffix

LEXICON kO
+kO:kO          hAn ;
                hAn ; ! continue without any suffix
! TO DO: Add the -han/-hän lexicon somewhere

LEXICON hAn
+hAn:hAn        # ;
                # ; ! continue without any suffix
                
END
